Utah statutes.
59-2-1601.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1)  "Contributing county" means a county that:
(a)  retains less revenue from the imposition of the multicounty assessing and
collecting levy within the county pursuant to Section 59-2-1603 than it
collects; and
(b)  transmits a portion of the revenue collected from the imposition of the
multicounty assessing and collecting levy to the Property Tax Valuation Agency
Fund pursuant to Section 59-2-1603.
(2)  "Contributing county surplus revenue" means an amount equal to the
difference between the following:
(a)  the revenue collected by a county from imposing the multicounty assessing
and collecting levy during a calendar year; and
(b)  the county's multicounty assessing and collecting allocation as
calculated in accordance with Subsection 59-2-1603(3).
(3)  "County additional property tax" means the property tax levy described in
Subsection 59-2-1602(4).
(4)  "Fund" means the Property Tax Valuation Agency Fund created in Section
59-2-1602.
(5)  "Maximum county contribution" means an amount equal to the following:
(a)  for a county of the first class, $300,000;
(b)  for a county of the second class, $100,000;
(c)  for a county of the third class, $100,000;
(d)  for a county of the fourth class, $50,000; and
(e)  for a county of the fifth or sixth class, $0.
(6)  "Minimum county contribution" means an amount equal to the following:
(a)  for a county of the first class, $300,000; and
(b)  for a county of the second or third class, $0.
(7)  "Multicounty assessing and collecting allocation" means the revenue to
which a county is entitled from the statewide imposition of the multicounty
assessing and collecting levy, as determined in accordance with the
calculation described in Subsection 59-2-1603(3).
(8)  "Multicounty assessing and collecting levy" means a property tax rate not
to exceed .0002 per dollar of taxable value levied in accordance with Section
59-2-1602.
(9) (a)  "Parcel" means an identifiable contiguous unit of real property that
is treated as separate for valuation or zoning purposes and includes any
improvements on that unit of real property.
(b)  "Parcel" or "other parcel" does not include an item of personal property.
(10)  "Receiving county" means a county that:
(a)  receives a disbursement from the Property Tax Valuation Agency Fund in
accordance with Section 59-2-1603; and
(b)  levies a county additional property tax of at least .0003 per dollar of
taxable value in accordance with Subsection 59-2-1602(4).
